Utah statutes.
49-16-603.   Suspension of benefit upon settlement of workers' compensation
claim.
(1)  Settlement of a claim for workers' compensation for injury or disability
shall suspend disability retirement benefits granted under this part, except
for the initial three months, to a member granted the benefits until workers'
compensation payments terminate.
(2)  If there is a lump-sum settlement of the workers' compensation claim, the
office shall suspend the disability retirement benefit until the total of
suspended benefits is equal to 75% of the settlement received from workers'
compensation.
